Missouri, session 2026, SB1236.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 191.885, to read as
follows:
191.885. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Drug or device company", a manufacturer,
developer, or distributor of pharmaceutical drugs or any
device used in the context of the physician's practice;
(2) "Open Payments database", the database created to
allow the public to search for data provided pursuant to 42
U.S.C. Section 1320a-7h and that is maintained by the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
2. (1) A physician shall provide to each patient at
the patient's office visit a written and verbal notice of
the Open Payments database, as well as notice of any
benefits the physician has recorded in the database as
receiving relating to any pharmaceutical item, drug, or
vaccine that the physician is recommending, including any
benefits received from the manufacturer of such item, drug,
or vaccine.
(2) The written notice shall include a signature from
the patient or the patient's representative and the date of

SB 1236 2
the signature and shall include information on how to locate
and access the Open Payments database.
(3) The physician shall include in the records for the
patient a record of the written notice required under this
section and shall give the patient or patient's
representative a copy of the signed and dated notice.
3. (1) A physician, or the physician's employer,
shall post in each location where the physician practices,
in an area that is likely to be seen by all persons who
enter the office, an Open Payments database notice, which
shall include, in easily readable font, an internet website
address for the Open Payments database and the following
statement: "For informational purposes only, a link to the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Open
Payments web page is provided here. The federal Physician
Payments Sunshine Act requires detailed information about
payment and other payments of value worth over ten dollars
($10) from manufacturers of drugs, medical devices, and
biologics to physicians and teaching hospitals be made
available to the public.".
(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, if an internet website
is used for a physician's practice, the physician, or the
physician's employer, shall conspicuously post the Open
Payments database notice described in subdivision (1) of
this subsection on that website.
4. A physician who fails to comply with the provisions
of this section shall be subject to discipline by the state
board of registration for the healing arts.
5. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
physicians while working in a hospital emergency department.
✓